tables/SV-SE-G2.ctb
# liblouis: Swedish Grade 2 Braille Table, contractions level 2.
#
#  Copyright (C) 2022 Insyn Scandinavia AB <david@insyn.se>
#  Copyright (C) 2012 Mesar Hameed <mesar.hameed@gmail.com>
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2008 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2006 JJB Software, Inc. www.jjb-software.com
#
#  This braille table is a heavily updated version of the former
#  Swedish braille table called Se-Se-G1.utb which was quite outdated and
#  was missing a lot of character definitions as well as incorrectly
#  handling some situations regarding mixing of numbers and letters
#  etc. This version also includes support for Swedish contractions
#  which previously haven't been available in Liblouis.
#  This new braille table is the result of a joint effort between
#  Punktskriftsnämnden (the Swedish Braille Authority) and
#  Insyn Scandinavia AB.
#
#  This braille table is based on the following documentation:
#  Svenska skrivregler för punktskrift:
#    https://www.mtm.se/skrivregler/dtb-bm-l1.html
#  Kortskrift nivå 1 och 2:
#    https://www.mtm.se/contentassets/08089b067f61495da1b035390d7a120e/kortskrift-niva-1-och-2---1997---nytt-manuskript-2016-09-26_v4.pdf
#  
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

### Table Metadata
#-name: Svensk 6-punkts förkortningstabell nivå 2
#-index-name: Swedish, fully contracted, 6-dot
#-display-name: Swedish 6-dot level 2 contracted braille
#+language: sv
#+type: literary
#+contraction: full
#+grade: 2
#+dots: 6
#+direction: both

# Load basic Swedish braille table grade 1 and grade 2
include SV-SE-G1.ctb

# Multiletter whole word contractions
word alla 1-1
contraction aa
word allas 1-1-234
contraction aas
word alltid 1-145
contraction ad
word aldrig 1-1245
contraction ag
word allt 1-2345
contraction at
word alltför 1-2345-1246
word allting 1-2345-236
word alltings 1-2345-236-234
word andra 1-2456
contraction aw
word andras 1-2456-234
contraction aws
word alltså 1-16
contraction aå
word börja 12-245
contraction bj
word början 12-245-1345
contraction bjn
word börjans 12-245-1345-234
contraction bjns
word börjar 12-245-1235
contraction bjr
word börjat 12-245-2345
contraction bjt
word började 12-245-1456
word bland 12-123
contraction bl
word blir 12-1235
contraction br
word blev 12-1236
contraction bv
word också 13-234
contraction ks
word dess 145-234
contraction ds
word dessa 145-234-1
contraction dsa
word dessas 145-234-1-234
contraction dsas
word endast 15-1
contraction ea
word henne 15-15
contraction ee
word hennes 15-15-234
contraction ees
word emedan 15-134-145
contraction emd
word emellan 15-134-123
contraction eml
word emellertid 15-134-2345
contraction emt
word fortfarande 124-135-124
contraction fof
word gång 1245-1245
contraction gg
word gångs 1245-1245-234
contraction ggs
word gångar 1245-1245-1-1235
contraction ggar
word gångars 1245-1245-1-1235-234
contraction ggars
word gångarna 1245-1245-1-1235-1345-1
contraction ggarna
word gångarnas 1245-1245-1-1235-1345-1-234
contraction ggarnas
word gången 1245-1245-126
word gångens 1245-1245-126-234
word gånger 1245-1245-156
word gångers 1245-1245-156-234
word gångerna 1245-1245-156-1345-1
word gångernas 1245-1245-156-1345-1-234
word hans 125-234
contraction hs
word hon 125-1345
contraction hn
word hade 125-1456
word inga 24-1
contraction ia
word ingas 24-1-234
contraction ias
word ingen 24-126
word ingens 24-126-234
word inget 24-346
word ingets 24-346-234
word ibland 24-12-123
contraction ibl
word ingenting 24-126-2345-236
word igenom 24-1245
contraction ig
word kanske 13-1
contraction ka
word komma 13-134-1
contraction kma
word kommer 13-134-156
word kommit 13-134-2345
contraction kmt
word kunna 13-1345
contraction kn
word kunnat 13-1345-2345
contraction knt
word kunde 13-1456
word liksom 123-134
contraction lm
word medan 134-145
contraction md
word många 134-1245
contraction mg
word mångas 134-1245-234
contraction mgs
word mellan 134-123
contraction ml
word men 134-126
word måste 134-1256
contraction mü
word någon 1345-1345
contraction nn
word någons 1345-1345-234
contraction nns
word någonting 1345-1345-2345-236
word något 1345-2345
contraction nt
word naturligtvis 1345-2345-1236
contraction ntv
word några 1345-2456
contraction nw
word någras 1345-2456-234
contraction nws
word olika 135-123
contraction ol # Abbreviation used for "unread" in Outlook
word honom 135-135
contraction oo
word omkring 135-236
word redan 1235-145
contraction rd
word sedan 234-145
contraction sd
word själv 234-245
contraction sj
word själva 234-245-1
contraction sja
word självt 234-245-2345
contraction sjt
word skall 234-13
contraction sk
word skulle 234-123
contraction sl
word sådan 234-1345
contraction sn
word sådana 234-1345-1
contraction sna
word sådant 234-1345-2345
contraction snt
word särskilt 234-345
contraction sä
word tills 2345-234
contraction ts
word tillbaka 2345-12
contraction tb
word vilka 1236-13-1
contraction vka
word vilkas 1236-13-1-234
contraction vkas
word vilken 1236-13-126
word vilkens 1236-13-126-234
word vilket 1236-13-346
word vilkets 1236-13-346-234
word vill 1236-123
contraction vl
word ville 1236-123-15
contraction vle
word överallt 1346-1-2345
contraction xat
word eftersom 1356-234
contraction zs
word ännu 345-136
contraction äu
word före 1246-15
word förr 1246-1235
word förra 1246-1235-1
word först 1246-234-2345
word första 1246-234-2345-1
word detta 2346-2345-1
word dettas 2346-2345-1-234
word denna 12346-1345-1
word dennas 12346-1345-1-234
word vara 12356-1
word varit 12356-24-2345
word varandra 12356-1-2456
word varandras 12356-1-2456-234

# Syllable contractions
midendword ing 236
partword ingen 236-126
partword inger 236-156
partword inget 236-346
partword de 1456
partword det 2346
partword den 12346

# Multiword contractions
word bland\x0020annat 12-123-36-1
word det\x0020vill\x0020säga 145-1236-234
word eller\x0020dylikt 15-36-145
word före\x0020detta 124-36-145
word för\x0020närvarande 124-36-1345
word för\x0020övrigt 124-36-246
word med\x0020flera 134-36-124-123
word med\x0020mera 134-36-134
word och\x0020dylikt 135-36-145
word och\x0020så\x0020vidare 135-234-1236
word så\x0020kallat 234-36-13
word till\x0020exempel 2345-36-15-1346
